Utah statutes.
70A-2-319.   F.O.B. and F.A.S. terms.

(1)  Unless otherwise agreed the term F.O.B. (which means "free on board") at
a named place, even though used only in connection with the stated price, is a
delivery term under which
(a)  when the term is F.O.B. the place of shipment, the seller must at that
place ship the goods in the manner provided in this chapter (Section
70A-2-504) and bear the expense and risk of putting them into the possession
of the carrier; or
(b)  when the term is F.O.B. the place of destination, the seller must at his
own expense and risk transport the goods to that place and there tender
delivery of them in the manner provided in this chapter (Section 70A-2-503);
(c)  when under either (a) or (b) the term is also F.O.B. vessel, car or other
vehicle, the seller must in addition at his own expense and risk load the
goods on board. If the term is F.O.B. vessel the buyer must name the vessel
and in an appropriate case the seller must comply with the provisions of this
chapter on the form of bill of lading (Section 70A-2-323).
(2)  Unless otherwise agreed the term F.A.S. vessel (which means "free
alongside") at a named port, even though used only in connection with the
stated price, is a delivery term under which the seller must
(a)  at his own expense and risk deliver the goods alongside the vessel in the
manner usual in that port or on a dock designated and provided by the buyer;
and
(b)  obtain and tender a receipt for the goods in exchange for which the
carrier is under a duty to issue a bill of lading.
(3)  Unless otherwise agreed in any case falling within Subsection (1)(a) or
(c) or Subsection (2) the buyer must seasonably give any needed instructions
for making delivery, including when the term is F.A.S. or F.O.B. the loading
berth of the vessel and in an appropriate case its name and sailing date. The
seller may treat the failure of needed instructions as a failure of co-
operation under this chapter (Section 70A-2-311). He may also at his option
move the goods in any reasonable manner preparatory to delivery or shipment.
(4)  Under the term F.O.B. vessel or F.A.S. unless otherwise agreed the buyer
must make payment against tender of the required documents and the seller may
not tender nor the buyer demand delivery of the goods in substitution for the
documents.
